Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-533.02
Involvement of parents, guardians, and educational decisionmakers; learning materials; availability.

To the extent practicable, each public school district shall make a reasonable effort to make any learning materials, including original materials, available for inspection by a parent, guardian, or educational decisionmaker upon request.

Laws 2024, LB71, § 6.